Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-20,104
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Mandatory indemnification.

A corporation shall indemnify a director who was wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding to which he or she was a party because he or she was a director of the corporation against reasonable expenses incurred by him or her in connection with the proceeding.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 104.

The nonpayment of corporate taxes and the issuance of a certificate of dissolution by the Secretary of State effectively dissolves a corporation, which begins the running of the 2-year statute of limitations. Eiche v. Blankenau, 253 Neb. 255, 570 N.W.2d 190 (1997).